Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-209
Persons authorized to act in relation to international will; eligibility; recognition by authorizing agency.

Individuals who have been admitted to practice law before the courts of this state and who are in good standing as active law practitioners in this state, are hereby declared to be authorized persons in relation to international wills.

Laws 2020, LB966, § 9.